Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.430

Prompt payment—Capital projects advisory review board—Review—Recommendations.

(1)(a) The capital projects advisory review board created in chapter 39.10 RCW shall review the extent to which prompt pay statutes meet the needs of small businesses, as defined in RCW 39.26.010, particularly women and minority-owned businesses as certified under chapter 39.19 RCW or as officially recognized as such by a local public entity. These statutes include RCW 39.04.250, 39.76.011, and 39.76.020.

(b) The capital projects advisory review board must present findings and any recommendations the board develops to the appropriate committees of the legislature on or before November 1, 2024.

(2) In carrying out the review and considering possible recommendations under subsection (1) of this section, the board shall engage with a broad range of stakeholders.

[ 2024 c 276 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2024 c 276: See notes following RCW 39.04.440.